Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3904
Actions for abduction prevention measures.

(a) A court on its own motion may order abduction prevention measures in a child custody proceeding if the court finds that the evidence establishes a credible risk of abduction of the child.

(b) A party to a child custody determination or another individual or entity having a right under the law of this state or any other state to seek a child custody determination for the child may file a petition seeking abduction prevention measures to protect the child under the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.

(c) A county attorney or the Attorney General may seek a warrant to take physical custody of a child under section 43-3909 or other appropriate prevention measures.

Laws 2007, LB341, § 4.